New York, session 2025-2026, A73.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "Healthy Homes Right To Know Act". 3 § 2. Legislative findings. The legislature finds and declares that: 4 1. New York has a long history of protecting its citizens by making 5 sure they have adequate knowledge to make informed purchasing decisions. 6 2. The public is broadly unaware of the health dangers posed by gas 7 stoves. On May 8, 2023, ten state attorneys general, including the 8 attorney general of New York State as well as the New York City Corpo- 9 ration Counsel, sent a letter to the Consumer Product Safety Commission 10 (CPSC), in which they asserted, "Most of the research and evidence on 11 the health risks associated with elevated levels of emissions from gas 12 appliances has been circulated among decisionmakers and engaged stake- 13 holders. This has left the public to try to piece together health and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00310-04-5 A. 73--B 2 1 safety information--which can be false or misleading--from the internet, 2 social media, and other non-authoritative sources. Thus, when it comes 3 to gas stove emissions, consumers are presently unprotected against, and 4 inadequately informed about, the health hazards these appliances pose." 5 Those dangers may now be particularly acute as, according to the U.S. 6 Environmental Protection Agency, "Americans on average, spend approxi- 7 mately 90% of their time indoors where concentrations of some pollutants 8 are often 2 to 5 times higher than typical outdoor concentrations." 9 3. The same letter suggests, "requiring warning labels on gas stoves 10 that provide more information on their health risks". The letter goes on 11 to say, "Proper labeling on gas stoves would represent an important step 12 in helping to educate consumers about the health risks associated with 13 gas stoves. Providing this information upfront is essential to enabling 14 consumers to make a fully informed decision." 15 4. Current New York state regulations regarding unvented gas appli- 16 ances are inconsistent. Since there is no statewide requirement that gas 17 stoves be ventilated to the outdoors, a precautionary approach to public 18 safety requires that these appliances be treated as unvented. 19 5. Although the research regarding the impacts of unvented gas heaters 20 is vastly less robust than that regarding gas stoves, the New York State 21 Department of Health nonetheless adopted regulations in January of 2023 22 to require labeling of unvented gas heaters including, "WARNING: This 23 appliance produces CARBON MONOXIDE, a poisonous gas. You MUST use carbon 24 monoxide alarms to avoid injury or death". Labeling requirements for 25 unvented heaters in California also include warnings of exposure to: 26 "...chemicals including benzene, which is known to the state of Califor- 27 nia to cause cancer and cause birth defects or other reproductive harm". 28 6. Given that the research regarding gas stoves is even more complete 29 and compelling, New York State should also act to inform the public as 30 has already been done with unvented gas heaters. 31 7. The scientific consensus on gas stove emissions is robust and grow- 32 ing. It is now understood that gas stoves can emit carbon monoxide 33 (CO), nitrogen dioxide (NO2), benzene, and formaldehyde. Methane emis- 34 sions can occur even when the gas stove is turned off. According to the 35 Concerned Health Professionals of New York and the Physicians for Social 36 Responsibility, "Nearly three-quarters of methane emissions from gas 37 stoves take place while the stove is turned off and not in use. At the 38 same time levels of hazardous air pollutants from everyday use of gas 39 stoves often exceed the limits of outdoor air quality standards. Indoor 40 concentrations are often much higher than health-protective guidelines 41 set by the World Health Organization." 42 8. According to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, 43 "Carbon monoxide, or "CO," is an odorless, colorless gas that can kill 44 you". The New York State Department of Health refers to carbon monoxide 45 as a poisonous gas. Approximately 430 people die each year from carbon 46 monoxide exposure. Thousands more become ill and seek medical attention. 47 Carbon monoxide poisoning is estimated to cause more than 50,000 emer- 48 gency room visits in the United States each year. According to the New 49 York State Department of Health, annually, "In New York State, about 200 50 people are hospitalized and over 1800 people visit an emergency depart- 51 ment because of accidental CO poisoning." The numbers of accidental 52 poisonings are on the rise. The U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission 53 "found evidence of a statistically significant upward trend in non-fire 54 CO deaths for the 11-year period from 2009 to 2019". According to 55 Preventative Medicine reports, "Accidental, non-fire related poisoning 56 accounts for over $1.3 billion annually in societal costs." A. 73--B 3 1 9. Notably, while carbon monoxide alarms are an important preventative 2 measure to lower the risk of carbon monoxide poisoning, they are not 3 guaranteed to be effective. According to the National Carbon Monoxide 4 Awareness Association: "Only 14% of families in the US have a properly 5 functioning carbon monoxide alarm". An earlier report showed that in 6 2009, 83% of NYC residents reported having CO alarms. However, only 54% 7 of them had recently tested or replaced their batteries. 8 10. Nitrogen dioxide, or NO2, is a gaseous air pollutant composed of 9 nitrogen and oxygen and is formed when fossil fuels are burned. The EPA 10 has determined that NO2 is "causal" of more severe respiratory symptoms 11 in people with asthma and that long-term exposure to NO2 is "likely 12 causal" of respiratory illnesses such as asthma. The New England Journal 13 of Medicine has found that, "Gas combustion in stoves, boilers and 14 furnaces generates oxides of nitrogen," to which the article attributes, 15 "Increased asthma risk; exacerbation of COPD and cardiovascular 16 disease". The EPA includes NO2 on its list of asthma triggers, and 17 "unvented combustion appliances, e.g. gas stoves" is first on its list 18 of "primary sources of NO2 indoors". 19 11. Each year, asthma accounts for more than 439,000 hospitalizations, 20 1.6 million emergency department visits, and 10.5 million physician 21 office visits in the United States. About 10 people die from the disease 22 every day. Asthma has been linked to 13.8 million missed school days and 23 14.2 million missed workdays annually. The cost of treating asthma in 24 the United States is $62.8 billion every year. 25 12. A 2013 meta-analysis of 41 studies found that children living in 26 homes with gas stoves had a 42 percent higher risk of experiencing asth- 27 ma symptoms, and, over their lifetime, a 24 percent increase in the risk 28 of being diagnosed with asthma, and a 2022 peer-reviewed research paper 29 published in the International Journal of Environmental Research and 30 Public Health found that more than 12% of current childhood asthma cases 31 in the US can be attributed to gas stove use. The same paper suggests 32 that attribution number is 18.8% of children with asthma in New York 33 State. 34 13. The asthma crisis does not equally affect all New York communi- 35 ties. Black Americans are approximately two times more likely to die of 36 asthma than White Americans. Further, the percentage of Black children 37 in the U.S. suffering from asthma is nearly twice that of White chil- 38 dren, and their death rate is ten times higher. According to a 2023 39 joint report from the New York State Department of Health and the New 40 York City Department of Health and Mental Hygiene, "The burden of asthma 41 falls disproportionately among specific demographic groups, specifically 42 for persons and communities of color, where asthma prevalence is higher 43 among Black, American Indian, and multiracial New Yorkers." The Centers 44 for Disease Control and Prevention concurs with the assessment of 45 disproportionate burden. 46 14. While the age-adjusted asthma mortality rate for New York City is 47 higher than for New York State as a whole, with the Bronx demonstrating 48 a notably higher mortality rate than the other boroughs, this problem 49 should not be construed as a New York City issue. Other hotspots exist 50 around the state. For example, years of academic research has convinc- 51 ingly demonstrated alarmingly high rates of asthma on Buffalo's West 52 Side. A study by Dr. Lwebuga-Mukasa, Professor of Medicine at the 53 University of Buffalo, found that "nearly 45% of West Side households 54 reported at least one case of chronic respiratory illness or asthma". 55 15. Gas and propane combustion from gas stoves emits benzene. A study 56 from the Stanford Woods Institute for the Environment found that a A. 73--B 4 1 single gas cooktop burner set on high, or an oven set at 350 degrees 2 Fahrenheit can, "raise indoor levels of the carcinogen benzene above 3 those of secondhand smoke". According to the World Health Organization, 4 "Human exposure to benzene has been associated with a range of acute and 5 long-term adverse health effects and diseases, including cancer and 6 haematological effects." 7 16. Formaldehyde is listed as a human carcinogen and has been found at 8 more elevated levels associated with gas burners set to "simmer". 9 17. Ventilation of gas stove emissions to the outdoors can improve 10 indoor air quality. However, many homeowners do not have ventilation, 11 and it is not required by state law. In addition, studies also show that 12 many people who have ventilation systems don't use them, often because 13 of noise concerns. Vents can become blocked with debris and the effec- 14 tiveness of ventilation systems can be compromised by changes in air 15 pressure in the building envelope caused by the opening of windows or 16 doors or the activation of bathroom fans, for example. Lastly, some 17 people with range hoods may be under the mistaken belief that pollutants 18 are being vented outdoors when in fact many hoods simply recirculate the 19 air into the kitchen after filtering it. The effectiveness of filtration 20 varies widely and is partially based on active maintenance of the 21 filtration system. 22 18. Therefore it is the intent of the legislature to promote public 23 health, support informed consumer choice, and create consistent public 24 policy, by requiring labeling regarding the health impacts of gas 25 stoves. 26 § 3. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 322-d 27 to read as follows: 28 § 322-d. Labeling requirements for gas stoves. 1. For the purposes of 29 this section, "gas stove" means a stove or range that utilizes natural 30 gas or propane and is used for indoor food preparation, whether in a 31 commercial or residential setting, and provides at least one of the 32 following functions: 33 (a) surface cooking; 34 (b) oven cooking; or 35 (c) broiling. 36 2. No person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation shall 37 manufacture, distribute, assemble, sell or offer for sale any new gas 38 stove unless the following requirements are met: 39 (a) A removable label is affixed to the gas stove, and a label is 40 either affixed to or printed on the package in which it is contained, if 41 applicable. Such label shall contain the following message: 42 "WARNING: Gas stoves can emit health harming pollutants (such as 43 NITROGEN DIOXIDE, CARBON MONOXIDE, BENZENE, and FORMALDEHYDE) at 44 potentially unsafe levels inside homes. The presence of these pollu- 45 tants can affect your health and may exacerbate or contribute to the 46 development of respiratory illnesses. Properly installed and operating 47 ventilation to the outdoors can reduce but not eliminate emissions." 48 (b) Such label shall be in a type size no smaller than the largest 49 type size used for other consumer information on the gas stove or pack- 50 age, and shall be in an easily viewable and accessible location on the 51 gas stove or package. 52 3. The department of state shall adopt regulations regarding the 53 placement and format of such labels outlined in subdivision two of this 54 section. A. 73--B 5 1 4. The department of state shall make available on its website a model 2 label, outlined in subdivision two of this section that can be used to 3 comply with the provisions of this section. 4 5. Any person who violates any provision of this section shall receive 5 a warning notice for the first such violation. A person shall be liable 6 to the state of New York for a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred 7 fifty dollars for the second violation and not to exceed one thousand 8 dollars for any subsequent violation. A hearing or opportunity to be 9 heard shall be provided prior to the assessment of any civil penalty. 10 6. The department of state and the office of the attorney general are 11 authorized to enforce the provisions of this section. 12 § 4. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 13 law.